Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1302
Community development agency; powers.

A city which has a community development agency as authorized by law is hereby granted power and authority to:

(1) Do all community development activities;

(2) Do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government in all matters relating to community development activities as a grantee, or as agent or otherwise; and

(3) Exercise the jurisdiction and authority granted under Chapter 71, article 15, acting independently, concurrently or by assisting or cooperating with any existing housing authority within the territorial jurisdiction of the city.

Laws 1974, LB 825, § 2.